Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 17. Reorganization of Government

Cross references. —

As to department of workforce services, see §

9-2-2018

.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1989, chs. 262 and 281, also each enacted an article 17 of this chapter 9. The provisions enacted by ch. 262 were renumbered as article 18. The provisions enacted by ch. 281 were renumbered as article 19.

§ 9-2-1701.
Short title.

This act may be cited as the “Wyoming Government Reorganization Act of 1989.”

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 138, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-2-1703(a)(x).

§ 9-2-1702.
Purpose.

The purpose of this act is to establish a framework whereby the executive branch of state government can be reorganized into a limited number of departments to ensure state resources are effectively and efficiently applied to implement programs and policy established in accordance with law thereby better serving the citizens of Wyoming. This act serves as the basic reorganization act, but each new department of state government as reorganized shall be created by a separate act. These separate acts creating a department establish a procedure under which detailed plans for organization of the department can be developed and submitted for review by the public and final approval by the legislature.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 138, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-2-1703(a)(x).

§ 9-2-1703.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Administrator” means the administrative head of a division within a department;

“Agency” means any board, commission, council, committee or office in the executive branch of state government except the offices listed in W.S. 9-2-1704(a) and the University of Wyoming;

“Department” means one (1) of not more than fourteen (14) principal administrative operating units of state government as created by separate legislation establishing a department and in accordance with this act;

“Department reorganization act” means an act of the legislature to create one (1) or more departments for the purpose of reorganization;

“Department reorganization plan” means the plan for final reorganization of a department developed by a director during the transition period as required by a department reorganization act;

“Director” means the administrative head of a department;

“Division” means one (1) of the principal operating units of a department the administrator of which is directly subordinate to the director;

“Type 1, Type 2 or Type 3 transfers” means as defined in W.S.

9-2-1707

(b);

“Transition period” means the period between the creation of the department under a department reorganization act and the date of implementation of a department reorganization plan as specified by law;

“This act” means W.S.

9-2-1701

through

9-2-1707

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 138, § 1; 1991, ch. 253, § 2; 2008, ch. 116, § 1.

The 2008 amendment

substituted “9-2-1707” for “9-2-1708” in (a)(x).

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Quoted

in

State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. v. Garl, 2001 WY 59, 26 P.3d 1029,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 2001).

§ 9-2-1704.
Reorganization plan; structure; time frame.

Pursuant to this act and other laws establishing individual departments, the entire executive branch of state government shall be organized into not more than sixteen (16) principal departments except for the offices of the following officials and except as provided in subsections (d) and (e) of this section:

Governor;

Secretary of state;

State treasurer;

State auditor;

Attorney general;

Superintendent of public instruction.

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 187, § 3.

The legislature may establish temporary agencies for periods not exceeding four (4) years which are not within a department or the office of an official specified in subsection (a) of this section. At the expiration of four (4) years, the agency and all its programs and functions shall either terminate or be assigned within an established department.

The entities of state government specified in this subsection are designated as separate operating agencies, which are separate and distinct from the departments and offices specified in subsection (a) of this section because of their quasi-judicial responsibility or because of their unique, specialized function which precludes their inclusion in another department. This act does not otherwise apply to separate operating agencies. Separate operating agencies are as follows:

Adjutant general’s department;

State public defender’s office;

State building commission;

Public service commission;

State board of equalization;

University of Wyoming;

Community college commission;

Oil and gas conservation commission;

State geological survey;

State board of parole;

Office of administrative hearings created by W.S.

9-2-2201

;

Wyoming water development office;

Office of state lands and investments;

Environmental quality council;

School facilities commission established under W.S.

21-15-113

;

Wyoming enhanced and improved oil recovery commission;

Office of guardian ad litem.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the governor, secretary of state, state treasurer, state auditor and the state superintendent of public instruction shall be subject to W.S. 9-2-1706(c) and (d) with respect to deputies and administrators employed within that office. For purposes of this subsection, the definitions in W.S.

9-2-1703

shall apply to the offices of the specified elected officials. This subsection shall only affect positions filled subsequently to its enactment and shall not be deemed to affect the property interests of current permanent employees within the offices addressed in this subsection.

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 74, § 3.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 138, § 1; 1991, ch. 218, § 1; ch. 253, § 2; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; ch. 30, § 2; ch. 42, § 3; ch. 55, § 3; ch. 60, § 3; 1995, ch. 163, § 1; 1996, ch. 74, § 3; 1996, ch. 100, § 2; 1998, ch. 13, § 1; 2001, ch. 187, §§ 2, 3; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 99, § 2; 2004, ch. 82, § 2; 2011, ch. 2, § 2; 2012, ch. 30, § 3; 2016 ch. 105, § 3, effective July 1, 2016; 2018 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2020 ch. 122, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

For the Wyoming enhanced and improved oil recovery commission, see §

30-8-101

.

The 2004 amendment

added (d)(xvi).

Laws 2004, ch. 82, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (d)(xv), inserted “and the school facilities department established under W.S.

21-15-123

.”

The 2012 amendment,

in the introductory language of (a), substituted “sixteen (16)” for “fifteen (15),” and substituted “and (e)” for “(e) and (f).”

Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, deleted “and the school facilities department established under
W.S.

21-15-123

” at the end of (d)(xv).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(i); in (c), deleted “Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section” at the beginning.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (d)(xvii).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-2-1703(a)(x).

§ 9-2-1705.
Authority of governor in reorganization.

Except as otherwise provided in the department reorganization act, with respect to any department created under a department reorganization act, the governor:

Shall appoint the director of the department, with the advice and consent of the senate, and may remove the director as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

;

Shall appoint all members of advisory councils associated with the department as specified by law;

May approve transfers of positions, persons, property and funds appropriated for such positions, persons or property, among divisions within a department created under a reorganization act. Nothing in this paragraph authorizes funds to be expended for any purpose other than that for which the funds were appropriated, except as otherwise specifically provided by law;

Shall annually report to the joint appropriations interim committee, not later than the first business day of each general or budget session, all transfers approved under paragraph (iii) of this subsection since the adjournment of the general or budget session during the previous year, including a summary of all positions, personnel, property and appropriated funds transferred. Nothing in this paragraph authorizes funds to be expended for any purpose other than that for which the funds were appropriated, except as otherwise specifically provided by law;

Notwithstanding any provision of law, may take any action necessary to prevent the loss of federal funds due solely to the effect of government reorganization.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 138, § 1; 1997, ch. 31, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-2-1706.
Department directors; term; authority; division heads.

A department director shall be appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate. His term of appointment expires at the end of the term of office of the governor during which he was appointed, unless sooner removed.

A department director serves at the pleasure of the governor and may be removed by him as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. Department directors are not subject to the state compensation or personnel system as conditions of their own employment but are otherwise state employees.

Department directors:

Shall:

Serve as administrative head of the department for which appointed;

Appoint administrators of divisions within the department;

Take the final agency action with respect to all matters, except as otherwise specifically provided by law;

Upon initial appointment prepare a department reorganization plan for submission to the legislature at the budget or general session occurring in the calendar year following the creation of the department. The director shall hold public hearings to receive information to assist in developing the plan.

May, after implementation of the department’s reorganization plan:

Remove administrators at will;

With the approval of the governor, transfer functions or programs within the department, or reorganize the department within the limitations established in the budget and the department reorganization act.

Administrators shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the department director and may be removed by him at any time without cause.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 138, § 1.

§ 9-2-1707.
Reorganization method; types of transfer.

If a bill to create a department as part of government reorganization is enacted into law:

The governor shall, not later than July 1 of the year in which the bill is enacted, appoint a department director. The director and any other staff necessary to assist the director during the transition shall serve in positions and be paid from funds available in the existing budgets of agencies and programs assigned to the department by law or appropriated to the governor’s office for reorganization;

Upon his appointment, the director shall become the immediate supervisor of all heads of agencies assigned to the department under a Type 1 transfer. Agency heads assigned under Type 1 transfers retain all rights and privileges under the state compensation and personnel system which existed immediately prior to the appointment of the director. No agency head shall be removed by a director before implementation of a department reorganization plan approved by the legislature but the director may fill vacancies;

The director shall prepare a plan for reorganization of the department which, after approval by the governor, shall be submitted on or before October 15 to the specified interim committees and to the legislature not later than December 1 of the year in which the department is created. All state agencies or departments shall cooperate with and provide all requested information to a department director developing a department reorganization plan under this paragraph. Public hearings regarding the plan shall be conducted by at least two (2) interim committees of the legislature specified in the bill creating the department prior to the succeeding legislative session. The plan, as approved by the legislature through a bill, shall be implemented not later than July 1 of the year in which the plan is approved. The plan shall reflect as much of the following basic structure as practicable:

The principal operating unit of a department is a division headed by an administrator;

The principal operating unit of a division is a program headed by a manager;

The principal operating unit of a program is a section headed by a supervisor;

The principal operating unit of a section is a subsection headed by a chief;

Departments may establish field offices which combine division, program, section and subsection functions;

A council is an advisory body created by specific statutory enactment and appointed to function on a continuing basis for the study of the problems arising in a specified functional or program area of state government and to provide recommendations and policy alternatives;

A committee is an advisory body created by or without specific statutory enactment for a limited time to study a specific problem and recommend a solution or policy alternative with respect to that problem. Its existence shall terminate upon the completion of its assignment;

A coordinating council is an interdepartmental advisory body created by law to coordinate programs and activities for which one (1) department has primary responsibility but in which one (1) or more other departments have an interest;

A commission, unless otherwise required by the state constitution, is a body created by specific statutory enactment within a department or the office of the governor exercising limited quasi-legislative or quasi-judicial powers, or both, independently of the director of the department or the governor.

Except as otherwise specified by law, all boards, commissions, councils or committees associated with an agency, assigned to a department under a Type 1 transfer shall be only advisory upon implementation of the department’s reorganization plan. During the transition period, boards, commissions, councils and committees shall retain existing authority for making grants, authorizing programs, rulemaking and for taking final agency action in contested cases, except as otherwise specifically provided in a department reorganization act, but shall have no authority regarding the internal administration of the agency. Any board or commission which grants licenses or permits to engage in a profession or occupation retains full authority to grant, deny or take any other action regarding those licenses or permits as exists under current law.

As used in reorganization acts to create departments, the following described transfers have the effects specified:

Type 1 transfer — A Type 1 transfer is the transfer of an existing agency or substantially all of the functions and programs of an existing agency to a department. This transfer includes the transfer of all positions, personnel, property and appropriated funds to the department to be used for the purposes specified under existing law until implementation of the legislatively approved reorganization plan. The department is responsible for all the programs and functions of an agency assigned to the department through a Type 1 transfer;

Type 2 transfer — A Type 2 transfer is the transfer of a program or function from an existing agency to a department when that agency is not assigned to the department under a Type 1 transfer and includes the transfer of a program or function from a department to a second department or an existing agency if that agency has not yet been assigned to a department. The positions, personnel, property and appropriated funds associated with the program or function shall not be transferred to or from the department unless specified in the department reorganization plan;

Type 3 transfer — A Type 3 transfer is the transfer of an agency with a primary function of issuing licenses or permits to engage in a profession or occupation to a department. The department shall provide budget, fiscal, administrative and clerical services to any agency requesting these services, but not affect its authority with respect to licensure. The positions, personnel, property and appropriated funds of these agencies shall not be transferred to the department. Any agency requesting the services described in this paragraph shall compensate the department for them at a reasonable rate established by the department. In addition to offering the optional services specified in this paragraph, the department shall:

Provide administrative oversight of agency procedures to assure that each agency is in compliance with existing statutes that created the agency and that govern the agency’s functions;

Provide guidance to agencies in matters pertaining to budget preparation, individual agency administration, personnel and other procedural functions in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the department;

Function as a liaison between individual agencies within the department and between agencies and other departments within state government;

Review the current practices of each agency and make recommendations to individual agencies which might improve the efficiency of the agency.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 138, § 1; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 2014 ch. 69, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

in (b)(iii)9B), added “in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the department” at the end.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subparagraph (a)(iii)(I) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-2-1708.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 149, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1989, ch. 138, § 1, created a joint reorganization committee.